Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. State Aid to Public Schools.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 99 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 478 et seq.

Determination of school attendance, enrollment, or pupil population for purpose of apportionment of funds. 80 ALR2d 953.

Sec. 14.17.010.
Public school foundation account. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.020.
State aid. [Repealed, § 1 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Secs. 14.17.021 — 14.17.022.
State foundation aid; money for centralized correspondence study. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.023.
Secondary formula account. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Secs. 14.17.024 — 14.17.026.
Money for state boarding schools; local contributions; supplementary state aid for regional educational attendance areas. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.027.
Revenue adjustment. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 14.17.030.
Required local effort. [Repealed, § 11 ch 95 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 14.17.031.
Allowable instructional units. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.040.
Basic need. [Repealed, § 1 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Secs. 14.17.041 — 14.17.047.
Elementary and secondary, vocational, special and bilingual educational instructional units. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.050.
Teachers’ salary allotment. [Repealed, § 1 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Secs. 14.17.051 — 14.17.056.
Area cost differential; instructional unit value. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.060.
Average daily membership allotment. [Repealed, § 1 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.17.061.
Supplemental programs. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 14.17.070.
Attendance center allotment. [Repealed, § 1 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.17.071.
Required local effort. [Repealed, § 21 ch 26 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 14.17.075.
Supplemental allocation. [Repealed, § 1 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.17.080.
Student count estimates. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.081.
Minimum expenditure for instruction. [Repealed, § 15 ch 75 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 14.17.082.
Fund balance in school operating fund. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.090.
Estimated average daily membership. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Secs. 14.17.100 — 14.17.120.
Computation of teachers’ salary allotment, average daily membership allotment, and attendance center allotment. [Repealed, § 2 ch 238 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 14.17.130.
Computation of required local effort. [Repealed, § 11 ch 95 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 14.17.139.
[Renumbered as AS 14.12.025.]

Sec. 14.17.140.
Determination of full and true value by Department of Community and Regional Affairs. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.150.
Duty of commissioner to examine and tabulate computations. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Secs. 14.17.160 — 14.17.170.
Student counting periods; distribution of state foundation aid. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.180.
Payment under final computation. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 14.17.190.
Restrictions governing receipt and expenditure of money from public school foundation account. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.200.
Regulations. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.205.
State aid to districts operating approved school food service programs. [Repealed, § 25 ch 91 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 14.17.210.
State aid to newly established district schools. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.215.
State aid to districts affected by state activities. [Repealed, § 20 ch 26 SLA 1980.]

Secs. 14.17.220 — 14.17.225.
Purpose; construction and implementation of chapter; pro rata reductions. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 14.17.230 — 14.17.240.
Transition; repealer. [Repealed, § 2 ch 71 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 14.17.250.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 39 ch 83 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.17.300.
Public education fund.

The public education fund is established. The fund consists of appropriations for

distribution to school districts, to the state boarding school, and for centralized correspondence study under this chapter; and

transportation of pupils under AS

14.09.010

.

Money appropriated to the fund may be expended without further appropriation. Money appropriated to the fund does not lapse. The money in the fund may be expended only in aid of public schools and for centralized correspondence study programs under this chapter and for transportation of pupils under AS

14.09.010

. Interest earned on money held in the fund before expenditure may be appropriated to the fund by the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent regarding appropriation to this fund of a portion of proceeds obtained from the retrospective application of certain provisions of the 2007 amendments of the production tax on oil and gas (AS 43.55), as authorized by ch. 74, SSSLA 2007, see § 1(c), ch. 1, SSSLA 2007.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective April 2, 2005, rewrote this section.

Sec. 14.17.400.
State aid for districts.

The state aid for which a school district is eligible in a fiscal year is equal to the amount for which a district qualifies under AS

14.17.410

.

If the amount appropriated to the public education fund for purposes of this chapter is insufficient to meet the amounts authorized under (a) of this section for a fiscal year, the department shall reduce pro rata each district’s basic need by the necessary percentage as determined by the department. If the basic need of each district is reduced under this subsection, the department shall also reduce state funding for centralized correspondence study and the state boarding school by the same percentage.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 4 SLA 2005)

Sec. 14.17.410.
Public school funding.

A district is eligible for public school funding in an amount equal to the sum calculated under (b) and (c) of this section.

Public school funding consists of state aid, a required local contribution, and eligible federal impact aid determined as follows:

state aid equals basic need minus a required local contribution and 90 percent of eligible federal impact aid for that fiscal year; basic need equals the sum obtained under (D) of this paragraph, multiplied by the base student allocation set out in AS

14.17.470

; district adjusted ADM is calculated as follows:

the ADM of each school in the district is calculated by applying the school size factor to the student count as set out in AS

14.17.450

;

the number obtained under (A) of this paragraph is multiplied by the district cost factor described in AS

14.17.460

;

the ADMs of each school in a district, as adjusted according to (A) and (B) of this paragraph, are added; the sum is then multiplied by the special needs factor set out in AS

14.17.420(a)(1)

and the secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor set out in AS

14.17.420(a)(3)

;

the number obtained for intensive services under AS

14.17.420(a)(2)

and the number obtained for correspondence study under AS

14.17.430

are added to the number obtained under (C) of this paragraph or under (H) and (I) of this paragraph;

notwithstanding (A) — (C) of this paragraph, if a school district’s ADM adjusted for school size under (A) of this paragraph decreases by five percent or more from one fiscal year to the next fiscal year, the school district may use the last fiscal year before the decrease as a base fiscal year to offset the decrease, according to the following method:

for the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year determined under this subparagraph, the school district’s ADM adjusted for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as the district’s ADM adjusted for school size, plus 75 percent of the difference in the district’s ADM adjusted for school size between the base fiscal year and the first fiscal year after the base fiscal year;

for the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year determined under this subparagraph, the school district’s ADM adjusted for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as the district’s ADM adjusted for school size, plus 50 percent of the difference in the district’s ADM adjusted for school size between the base fiscal year and the second fiscal year after the base fiscal year;

for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year determined under this subparagraph, the school district’s ADM adjusted for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph is calculated as the district’s ADM adjusted for school size, plus 25 percent of the difference in the district’s ADM adjusted for school size between the base fiscal year and the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year;

the method established in (E) of this paragraph is available to a school district for the three fiscal years following the base fiscal year determined under (E) of this paragraph only if the district’s ADM adjusted for school size determined under (A) of this paragraph for each fiscal year is less than the district’s ADM adjusted for school size in the base fiscal year;

the method established in (E) of this paragraph does not apply to a decrease in the district’s ADM adjusted for school size resulting from a loss of enrollment that occurs as a result of a boundary change under AS 29;

notwithstanding (A) — (C) of this paragraph, if one or more schools close and consolidate with one or more other schools in the same community and district and, as a result of the consolidation, basic need generated by the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph decreases, the district may use the last fiscal year before the consolidation as the base fiscal year to offset that decrease for the first four fiscal years following consolidation according to the following method:

for the first two fiscal years after the base fiscal year, the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, multiplying that number by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, and adding that number to the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph;

for the third fiscal year after the base fiscal year, the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, multiplying that number by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, multiplying that number by 66 percent, and adding that number to the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph;

for the fourth fiscal year after the base fiscal year, the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph is calculated by dividing the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph for the base fiscal year by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the base fiscal year without adjustment, and subtracting the quotient obtained by dividing the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year, multiplying that number by the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year without adjustment, multiplying that number by 33 percent, and adding that number to the sum of the district’s ADM of the consolidated schools for the current fiscal year as adjusted under (A) — (C) of this paragraph;

to calculate the district’s basic need for each fiscal year, the number obtained through the calculation in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subparagraph is added to the number obtained under (C) of this paragraph for the remainder of the district;

if the basic need calculated under (H)(i) — (iii) of this paragraph for one of the first four fiscal years after consolidation is less than the basic need calculated under (A) — (C) of this paragraph for that fiscal year, the basic need may not be adjusted under (H) of this paragraph for that fiscal year;

a district may not offset a decrease under (H) of this paragraph if

a new facility is constructed in the district for the consolidation; or

the district offset a decrease under (E) of this paragraph in the same fiscal year;

a district that offsets a decrease under (H) of this paragraph may not reopen a school that was closed for consolidation in the district until

seven or more years have passed since the school closure; and

the district provides evidence satisfactory to the department that the schools affected by the consolidation are over capacity;

a district may not reopen and reconsolidate a school that was consolidated in the district more than once every seven years for purposes of the calculations made under (H) of this paragraph;

a district offsetting a decrease under (H) of this paragraph shall provide the department with the list of schools participating in the consolidation and the corresponding ADM;

the required local contribution of a city or borough school district is the equivalent of a 2.65 mill tax levy on the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS

14.17.510

and AS

29.45.110

, not to exceed 45 percent of a district’s basic need for the preceding fiscal year as determined under (1) of this subsection.

In addition to the local contribution required under (b)(2) of this section, a city or borough school district in a fiscal year may make a local contribution of not more than the greater of

the equivalent of a two mill tax levy on the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS

14.17.510

and AS

29.45.110

; or

23 percent of the total of the district’s basic need for the fiscal year under (b)(1) of this section and any additional funding distributed to the district in a fiscal year according to (b) of this section.

State aid may not be provided to a city or borough school district if the local contributions required under (b)(2) of this section have not been made.

If a city or borough school district is established after July 1, 1998, for the first three fiscal years in which the city or borough school district operates schools, local contributions may be less than the amount that would otherwise be required under (b)(2) of this section, except that

in the second fiscal year of operations, local contributions must be at least the greater of

the local contributions, excluding federal impact aid, for the previous fiscal year; or

the sum of 10 percent of the district’s eligible federal impact aid for that year and the equivalent of a one mill tax levy on the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the city or borough school district as of January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS

14.17.510

and AS

29.45.110

; and

in the third year of operation, local contributions must be at least the greater of

the local contributions, excluding federal impact aid, for the previous fiscal year; or

the sum of 10 percent of the district’s eligible federal impact aid for that year and the equivalent of a two mill tax levy on the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year, as determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS

14.17.510

and AS

29.45.110

.

A school district is eligible for additional state aid in the amount by which the local contributions that would otherwise have been required under (b)(2) of this section exceed the district’s actual local contributions under (e) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am §§ 3, 4 ch 19 SLA 2012; am § 24 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this section in accordance with § 91(a)(2), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (b), (c), and (e) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For provision providing that the 2018 amendment of subsection (b) “applies to schools that consolidate on or after August 11, 2018”, see sec. 3, ch. 82, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, added “and the high school vocational education factor set out in AS

14.17.420(a)(3)

” at the end of (b)(1)(C).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (b)(1)(C), substituted “secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding” for “high school vocational education”, in (b)(2), substituted “2.65 mill” for “four mill”, in (e)(1)(B), substituted “one mill” for “two mill”, and in (e)(2)(B), substituted “two mill” for “three mill”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote (c)(2), which read, “23 percent of the district’s basic need for the fiscal year under (b)(1) of this section”.

The 2018 amendment, effective August 11, 2018, in (b)(1)(D), added “or under (H) and (I) of this paragraph” at the end, added (b)(1)(H) – (M).

Sec. 14.17.420.
Funding for special needs, secondary school vocational and technical instruction, and intensive services.

As a component of public school funding, a district is eligible for special needs and secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding and may be eligible for intensive services funding as follows:

special needs funding is available to a district to assist the district in providing special education, gifted and talented education, vocational education, and bilingual education services to its students; a special needs funding factor of 1.20 shall be applied as set out in AS

14.17.410(b)(1)

;

in addition to the special needs funding for which a district is eligible under (1) of this subsection, a district is eligible for intensive services funding for each special education student who needs and receives intensive services and is enrolled on the last day of the count period; for each such student, intensive services funding is equal to the intensive student count multiplied by 13;

in addition to the special needs and intensive services funding available under (1) and (2) of this subsection, secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding is available to assist districts in providing vocational and technical instruction to students who are enrolled in a secondary school; a secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor of 1.015 shall be applied as set out in AS

14.17.410(b)(1)

; in this paragraph, “vocational and technical instruction” excludes costs associated with

administrative expenses; and

instruction in general literacy, mathematics, and job readiness skills.

If a district offers special education, gifted and talented education, vocational education, or bilingual education services, in order to receive funding under (a)(1) of this section, the district must file with the department a plan that indicates the services that will be provided to students who receive these services.

In this section, “intensive services” has the meaning given by the department by regulation adopted under AS

14.30.180

—

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 9 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 5 ch 19 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For bilingual-bicultural education, see 4 AAC 34.

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

For program administration: gifted children, see 4 AAC 52, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, inserted “and high school vocational and technical instruction” in the introductory paragraph in (a), added (a)(3), and made a related change.

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “secondary school vocational” for “high school vocational” in the introductory language of (a) and near the beginning of (a)(3); in the introductory language of (a)(3), substituted “a secondary school” for “grades nine through twelve” following “who are enrolled in” near the middle and substituted “a secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor of 1.015” for “a high school vocational and technical instruction funding factor of 1.01”.

Sec. 14.17.430.
State funding for correspondence study.

Except as provided in AS

14.17.400(b)

, funding for the state centralized correspondence study program or a district correspondence program, including a district that offers a statewide correspondence study program, includes an allocation from the public education fund in an amount calculated by multiplying the ADM of the correspondence program by 90 percent.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 4 SLA 2005; am § 25 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “90 percent” for “80 percent” at the end.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A book may not be approved for use in publicly provided education if it advocates a partisan, sectarian, or denominational doctrine.
To allow otherwise would permit a school board to advocate partisan, sectarian, and denominational doctrines in a public classroom through textbooks.
September 20, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.17.440.
State funding for state boarding schools.

Except as provided in AS

14.17.400(b)

, funding for state boarding schools established under AS

14.16.010

includes an allocation from the public education fund in an amount calculated by

determining the ADM of state boarding schools by applying the school size factor to the student count as described in AS

14.17.450

;

multiplying the number obtained under (1) of this subsection by the special needs factor in AS

14.17.420(a)(1)

and the secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding factor set out in AS

14.17.420(a)(3)

and multiplying that product by the base student allocation; and

multiplying the product determined under (2) of this subsection by the district cost factor that is applicable to calculation of the state aid for the adjacent school district under AS

14.17.460

.

State boarding schools are also eligible for intensive services funding under AS

14.17.420(a)(2)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 4 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 6 ch 19 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, inserted “and the high school vocational education factor set out in AS

14.17.420(a)(3)

” in (a)(2).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(2), substituted “secondary school vocational and technical instruction funding” for “high school vocational education”.

Sec. 14.17.450.
School size factor.

For purposes of calculating a school’s ADM to determine state aid, the ADM of each school in a district shall be computed by applying the following formula:

If the ADM in a school is less than 10, those students shall be included in the ADM of the school in that district with the lowest ADM as determined by the most recent student count data for that district.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, if the student count in a charter school is less than 150, the adjusted student count for the school shall be calculated by multiplying the student count by the student rate for a school that has a student count of 400.

If a charter school has a student count of at least 75 but less than 150 for the current year and is in the first three years of operation or had a student count of at least 75 in the previous year of operation,

the adjusted student count for the school shall be calculated by multiplying the student count by the student rate for a school that has a student count of 150; and

not later than February 15, the charter school shall submit for approval of the governing board of the district a plan for the following school year that includes a statement about whether the school will continue to operate if the student count remains the same that year and, if so, a projection of the funding anticipated from the state and other sources, a proposed budget, and a description of anticipated changes to the school staff, program, and curriculum; if the school intends to close if the student count remains the same the following year, the plan must describe transfer plans for students, staff, facilities, and materials.

If an alternative school has a student count of more than 120 but less than 175 for the current year and is in the first year of operation or had a student count of 175 or more in the previous year of operation, the adjusted student count for the school shall be calculated by multiplying the student count by 95 percent of the student rate for a school that has a student count of 175.

In (c) — (e) of this section, “student rate” is calculated by adding the base and the multiplier provided under (a) of this section and dividing the sum by the student count.

If the student count in a school is The adjusted student count is At least But less than Base Multiplier The number of students in excess of
10 - 20 39.6
20 - 30 39.6 + (1.62 x 20)
30 - 75 55.8 + (1.49 x 30)
75 - 150 122.85 + (1.27 x 75) 150 - 250 218.1 + (1.08 x 150) 250 - 400 326.1 + (0.97 x 250) 400 - 750 471.6 + (0.92 x 400) 750 or over 793.6 + (0.84 x 750).

Click to view

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2009; am § 26 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective August 13, 2009, added subsections (c) through (f).

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the introductory language in (d), which read, “If a charter school has a student count of more than 120 but less than 150 for the current year and is in the first year of operation or had a student count of 150 or more in the previous year of operation”, and in (d)(1) deleted “95 percent of” following “the student count by”.

Sec. 14.17.460.
District cost factors.

For purposes of calculating a district’s adjusted ADM under AS

14.17.410(b)(1)

, the district cost factor for a school district is (1) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009, the factor set out under column (A) of this subsection, (2) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2010, the factor set out under column (B) of this subsection, (3) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2011, the factor set out under column (C) of this subsection, (4) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012, the factor set out under column (D) of this subsection, and (5) for fiscal years ending on or after June 30, 2013, the factor set out under column (E) of this subsection:

The department shall monitor the cost factors established under (a) of this section and shall prepare and submit to the legislature by January 15 of every other fiscal year proposed district cost factors.

DISTRICT COST FACTOR DISTRICT (A) (B) (C) (D) (E) Alaska Gateway 1.443 1.481 1.519 1.557 1.594 Aleutians East 1.707 1.778 1.849 1.920 1.991 Aleutians Region 1.838 1.864 1.890 1.916 1.939 Anchorage 1.000 1.000 1.000 1.000 1.000 Annette Island 1.175 1.216 1.257 1.298 1.338 Bering Strait 1.762 1.821 1.880 1.939 1.998 Bristol Bay 1.370 1.397 1.424 1.451 1.478 Chatham 1.348 1.405 1.462 1.519 1.576 Chugach 1.395 1.420 1.445 1.470 1.496 Copper River 1.246 1.264 1.282 1.300 1.316 Cordova 1.165 1.182 1.199 1.216 1.234 Craig 1.108 1.133 1.158 1.183 1.206 Delta/Greely 1.174 1.191 1.208 1.225 1.241 Denali 1.323 1.326 1.329 1.332 1.332 Dillingham 1.300 1.312 1.324 1.336 1.346 Fairbanks 1.055 1.059 1.063 1.067 1.070 Galena 1.370 1.376 1.382 1.388 1.391 Haines 1.104 1.128 1.152 1.176 1.200 Hoonah 1.227 1.270 1.313 1.356 1.399 Hydaburg 1.295 1.348 1.401 1.454 1.504 Iditarod 1.658 1.705 1.752 1.799 1.846 Juneau 1.075 1.093 1.111 1.129 1.145 Kake 1.242 1.296 1.350 1.404 1.459 Kashunamiut 1.504 1.533 1.562 1.591 1.619 Kenai Peninsula 1.088 1.109 1.130 1.151 1.171 Ketchikan 1.085 1.106 1.127 1.148 1.170 Klawock 1.160 1.196 1.232 1.268 1.302 Kodiak Island 1.191 1.216 1.241 1.266 1.289 Kuspuk 1.584 1.622 1.660 1.698 1.734 Lake and Peninsula 1.776 1.831 1.886 1.941 1.994 Lower Kuskokwim 1.577 1.599 1.621 1.643 1.663 Lower Yukon 1.650 1.703 1.756 1.809 1.861 Matanuska-Susitna 1.040 1.048 1.056 1.064 1.070 Mt. Edgecumbe 1.098 1.123 1.148 1.173 1.195 Nenana 1.304 1.313 1.322 1.331 1.338 Nome 1.385 1.402 1.419 1.436 1.450 North Slope 1.648 1.684 1.720 1.756 1.791 Northwest Arctic 1.686 1.720 1.754 1.788 1.823 Pelican 1.384 1.408 1.432 1.456 1.477 Petersburg 1.122 1.153 1.184 1.215 1.244 Pribilof 1.555 1.589 1.623 1.657 1.691 Sitka 1.098 1.123 1.148 1.173 1.195 Skagway 1.159 1.163 1.167 1.171 1.174 Southeast Island 1.264 1.299 1.334 1.369 1.403 Southwest Region 1.554 1.587 1.620 1.653 1.685 St. Mary’s 1.488 1.522 1.556 1.590 1.624 Tanana 1.641 1.677 1.713 1.749 1.786 Unalaska 1.343 1.368 1.393 1.418 1.441 Valdez 1.133 1.143 1.153 1.163 1.170 Wrangell 1.080 1.100 1.120 1.140 1.159 Yakutat 1.229 1.275 1.321 1.367 1.412 Yukon Flats 1.892 1.948 2.004 2.060 2.116 Yukon/Koyukuk 1.669 1.711 1.753 1.795 1.835 Yupiit 1.596 1.628 1.660 1.692 1.723.

Click to view

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am §§ 5, 6 ch 41 SLA 2006; am § 7 ch 9 SLA 2008)

Sec. 14.17.470.
Base student allocation.

The base student allocation is $5,930.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 95 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 6 FSSLA 2005; am § 7 ch 41 SLA 2006; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 9 SLA 2008; am §§ 27, 28 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, increased the allocation from $4,010 to $4,169.

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, substituted “$4,576” for “$4,169.”

The 2005 amendment, effective July 23, 2005, substituted “$4,919” for “$4,576”.

The 2006 amendment, effective May 23, 2006, substituted “$5,380” for “$4,919.”

The 2008 amendment, effective July 1, 2008, substituted “$5,480” for “$5,380;” effective July 1, 2009, substituted “$5,580” for “$5,480;” and effective July 1, 2010, substituted “$5,680” for “$5,580.”

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “$5,830” for “$5,680”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “$5,880” for “$5,830”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “$5,930” for “$5,880”.

Sec. 14.17.480.
Quality school funding.

As a component of public school funding, a district is eligible to receive a quality school funding grant not to exceed the district’s adjusted ADM multiplied by $16. The department shall by regulation establish a grant process to implement this section.

For purposes of the reduction required under AS

14.17.400(b)

, funding authorized under (a) of this section is treated the same as the state share of public school funding under AS

14.17.410

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For quality school funding grants, see 4 AAC 33, art. 3.

Sec. 14.17.490.
Public school funding adjustments.

Except as provided in (b) — (e) of this section, if, in fiscal year 1999, a city or borough school district or a regional educational attendance area would receive less public school funding under AS

14.17.410

than the district or area would have received as state aid, the district or area is, in each fiscal year, eligible to receive additional public school funding equal to the difference between the public school funding the district or area was eligible to receive under AS

14.17.410

in fiscal year 1999 and the state aid the district or area would have received in fiscal year 1999.

A city or borough school district is not eligible for additional funding authorized under (a) of this section unless, during the fiscal year in which the district receives funding under (a) of this section, the district received a local contribution equal to at least the equivalent of a 2.65 mill tax levy on the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district as of January 1 of the second preceding fiscal year as determined by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development under AS

14.17.510

and AS

29.45.110

.

For the purposes of the reduction required under AS

14.17.400(b)

, funding authorized under (a) of this section is treated the same as the state share of public school funding under AS

14.17.410

.

Beginning in fiscal year 2000, if a district receives more public school funding under AS

14.17.410

than the district received in the preceding fiscal year, any amount received by the district under this section shall be reduced. The amount of the reduction required under this subsection is equal to the amount of increase from the preceding fiscal year in public school funding multiplied by 40 percent. In this subsection, “public school funding” does not include funding under this section.

Beginning in fiscal year 2000, in each fiscal year, the department shall compare each district’s ADM with the district’s ADM in fiscal year 1999. If the current fiscal year ADM is less than 95 percent of the district’s ADM in fiscal year 1999, the department shall reduce the district’s public school funding calculated under (a) of this section by a percentage equal to the percentage of decrease in the district’s ADM.

For purposes of this section, “state aid” means state aid distributed under the provisions of AS 14.17, as those provisions read on January 1, 1998, and additional district support appropriated by the legislature for fiscal year 1998.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 19 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 91(a)(2), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (b) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in (b), substituted “2.65 mill tax levy” for “four mill tax levy”.